Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2602] Fines and other penalties.
The board of regents may enforce its rules by imposing fines not to exceed $100
per violation, or by removing the vehicle of the offender from the area within
the university's jurisdiction, or both; provided that a person violating any
provision of part III of chapter 291, or any rule adopted thereunder, shall be
guilty of a traffic infraction under chapter 291D and shall be fined or
otherwise penalized in accordance with part III of chapter 291. The owner of
any vehicle so towed away shall be responsible for and pay all costs incurred
in the towing and storage. Any vehicle towed away and unclaimed thirty days
thereafter shall be sold at public auction by the university. The university
shall pay all costs of towing and storage and other costs connected with the
sale out of the university parking revolving fund established under section
[304A-2275]. The fund shall be reimbursed for the costs from the proceeds of
the sale, and the remaining balance, if any, shall be paid to the owner of the
vehicle; provided that if the proceeds of the sale are not claimed by the owner
of the vehicle within sixty days after notice, the proceeds shall be deposited
in the university parking revolving fund. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next